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DTC C1233 /33,C 1234 /34 YawRateSensorCircuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

C1233 / 33

When any of the following 1. through 4. is detected:
1. ECU terminal IG1 voltage is 9.5 V to 17.0 V, and the

condition that yaw rate sensor voltage is out of the range
from 0.25 V to 4.75 V continued for 1 sec. or more.

2. The conditions that yaw rate sensor open detect circuit
signal is ON and the voltage of ECU terminal IG1 is 9.5
V to 17 V continued for 1 sec. or more.

3. The conditions that yaw rate sensor power source volt-
age is out of the range from 4.4 V to 5.6 V and the volt-
age of ECU terminal IG1 is 9.5 V to 17 V continued for 1
sec. or more.

4. When the condition that yaw rate sensor signal is mo-
mentarilyopenoccurs10 timesormoreand thevoltage
of ECU terminal IG1 is 9.5 V to 17 V.

SYawratesensor
SYawratesensorcircuit

C1234 /34

Condition 1. or 2. is detected:
1. When the condition that yaw rate sensor VYS terminal

voltage is 4.75 V to 5.25 V and YD malfunction signal of
yaw rate sensor is ON continued for 5 sec. or more.

2. Shift lever position is in P range and output voltage of
yawratesensor isoutof the range from2.4V to2.6V
or after the difference from zero point calibration voltage
of yaw rate sensor has become 0.08 V or more and
when the condition that the vehicle speed exceeds more
than 15 km/h (9 mph) while output condition of yaw rate
sensor has been repeated more than 3 times.
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Perform zero point calibration of the yaw rate sensor (See page DI−1 85).

2 Is DTC still output?

Check DTC on page DI−185.

NO No problem.

YES

3 Check output value of the yaw rate sensor.

Incaseofusingthehand −held tester:
PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the 2 bolts and yaw rate sensor with connector

still connected.
(b)Connect thehand −held tester to theDLC3.
(c)Turn the ignitionswitch toONandpush thehand −held

tester main switch to ON.
(d)Select theDATALISTmodeon thehand −held tester.
CHECK:
Check that the yaw rate value of the yaw rate sensor displayed
on thehand −held testerchanges.Place theyawratesensor
vertically to the ground and turn the sensor pivoted on its center.
OK:

Yaw rate value must be changing.
Incaseofnotusingthehand −held tester:
PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the yaw rate sensor with the connector still con-

nected to it.
(b) Turn the ignition switch to ON.
CHECK:
Measurevoltagebetween terminalsYAW2(1) − GYAW(5),and
terminalsYD(6) − GYAW(5)of theyawratesensor.
OK:

Terminals 1 and 5
(YAW2 − GYAW)

About2.42V − 2.58V

Terminals 6 and 5
(YD − GYAW)

About4.5V − 5.3V



F02864

GND YD

(−) (+)

ON

DI−246 −DIAGNOSTICS ABS & VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) &
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP (RM970E)

NG Replace yaw rate sensor.

OK

4 Check voltage between terminals YD and GND of skid control ECU.

PREPARATION:
Rem ove t he skid c ont r ol ECU wit h t he connect or s t ill con-
nected.
CHECK:
(a) Turn the ignition switch to ON.
(b) Measure voltage between terminals YD and GND of skid

control ECU.
OK:

Voltage: 4.5 − 5.3 V

OK Check and replace skid control ECU.

NG

5 Check for open and short circuit in harness and connector between yaw rate
sensor and skid control ECU (See page IN−38).

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

Check and replace skid control ECU.


